Alabama, session 2026rs, HB651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
26 Section 1. Section 32-6-64, Code of Alabama 1975, is
27 amended to read as follows:
28 "§32-6-64
Page 1

"§32-6-64
HB651 INTRODUCED
29 (a)(1) The design of license plates, including all
30 emblems, slogans, symbols, or characters appearing on the
31 plates, shall be by rule as adopted by the Commissioner of
32 Revenue, and as otherwise specified by law. The face of the
33 license plate to be displayed shall be fully treated with a
34 reflective material whichthat will increase the nighttime
35 visibility and legibility of the plate.
36 (2) Characters on the license plate which designate the
37 county of issuance shall be numeric, and all numerals on the
38 license plates shall be no smaller than two and three-fourths
39 inches in height. The following numbering scheme shall be
40 used:
41 a. Jefferson County, 1; Mobile County, 2; Montgomery
42 County, 3.
43 b. All other counties shall be ranked alphabetically
44 and assigned consecutive numbers beginning with 4 and
45 concluding with 67.
46 c. The Department of Revenue shall be responsible for
47 the numbering of distinctive license plates and shall
48 establish a system to minimize duplication of license plate
49 numbers. License plates that shall be are approved for
50 manufacture under subsection (b) shall be numbered or
51 personalized.
52 (b) The sponsoring organization of any new or reissued
53 distinctive license plate that is not of an in-state college
54 or in-state university as provided in subsection (b) of
55 Section 32-6-150(b), or the Alabama Gold Star Family license
56 plate as provided in Section 32-6-630 or a military or veteran
Page 2

plate as provided in Section 32-6-630 or a military or veteran
HB651 INTRODUCED
57 related category shall assure a minimum quantity of 250
58 registrations in order for the proposed plate to qualify for
59 production consideration by the legislative oversight
60 committee under the provisions of Section 32-6-67.
61 (1) The procedure to assure the quantity minimum for a
62 distinctive license plate shall be as follows:
63 a. The sponsoring organization shall apply to the
64 Department of Revenue for approval for the proposed
65 distinctive license plate from the legislative oversight
66 committee. A sponsoring organization shall be limited to one
67 distinctive license plate design per application. At the time
68 of application, and upon payment of the application fee
69 required in paragraph b., if applicable, the sponsoring
70 organization shall submit a design for the plate or logo for
71 the quantity class being applied for as described below:
72 1. Quantity Class 1 (250 to 999 registrations). A new
73 distinctive license plate category, or an existing distinctive
74 license plate to be reissued, in which registrations are
75 estimated to be at least 250, but less than 1,000, shall be in
76 conformity with the design approved by the legislative
77 oversight committee for license plates in this quantity class.
78 This plate shall include a space designated on the left side
79 of the license plate, not exceeding two and one-half inches in
80 width and height, in which an appropriate emblem, slogan, or
81 logo design may be applied to represent the organization for
82 whom the distinctive license plate is issued. Each proposed
83 emblem, slogan, symbol, or logo shall be subject to the
84 approval of the legislative oversight committee.
Page 3

approval of the legislative oversight committee.
HB651 INTRODUCED
85 2. Quantity Class 2 (1,000 or greater registrations).
86 This quantity class may use the logo system described for
87 Quantity Class 1, or may use a unique design for the entire
88 plate which is approved by the legislative oversight committee
89 and meets all other design and manufacture requirements of
90 Alabama law.
91 b. Effective January 1, 2022, each sponsoring
92 organization shall submit an application fee equal to the cost
93 of producing the distinctive license plate template not to
94 exceed one hundred dollars ($100) at the time the initial
95 application is made, the funds of which shall be distributed
96 by the Comptroller to the Department of Corrections to cover
97 the costs of producing the template of the distinctive license
98 plate for the sponsoring organization. On or before October 1,
99 2021, and by each October 1 thereafter, the Department of
100 Corrections shall certify the cost of production to the
101 legislative oversight committee for the subsequent calendar
102 year.
103 c. After the legislative oversight committee approval
104 and notification to the Department of Revenue, the department
105 shall also coordinate with the Comptroller to establish
106 funding procedures for depositing and maintaining monies held
107 pending issuance of the new category of license plates.
108 d. Each personindividual desiring to register a vehicle
109 in the new category shall make application and shall remit, as
110 a commitment to purchase, the additional fee associated with
111 the license plate category in a manner as prescribed by rule
112 of the Commissioner of Revenue. Any credit card processing fee
Page 4

of the Commissioner of Revenue. Any credit card processing fee
HB651 INTRODUCED
113 associated with the transaction shall be paid by the
114 personindividual making the commitment to purchase the
115 distinctive license plate and shall be nonrefundable.
116 e. The Department of Revenue shall deduct from the
117 additional fee and retain a two and one-half percent
118 commission. The balance shall be forwarded to the Comptroller
119 to be retained in escrow, until such time as the revenue
120 received is equal to or greater than the minimum amount
121 required to issue license plates in that category. If, after
122 one year from the date of notification of approval by the
123 legislative oversight committee, the number of subscribers for
124 a category fails to reach 250 for Quantity Class 1, or fails
125 to reach 1,000 for Quantity Class 2, the Comptroller shall pay
126 the money in escrow to the sponsoring organization and no
127 further consideration for production of this proposed
128 distinctive plate shall be made under this application. In
129 addition, the sponsoring organization may not submit another
130 application for a distinctive license plate for a period of
131 one year from the date the commitment to purchase period
132 ended.
133 f. Upon determination by the Department of Revenue that
134 a sufficient number of applications for a plate category has
135 been received, the department shall initiate the ordering
136 processes for design and manufacture of the approved license
137 plate. At that time, the Comptroller shall pay out of the
138 escrow account the amounts referred to in Section 32-6-68.
139 (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions to the
140 contrary, except where specifically provided by this
Page 5

contrary, except where specifically provided by this
HB651 INTRODUCED
141 subsection, no distinctive license plates shall be reissued
142 unless the following requirements are met:
143 a. For Quantity Class 1 distinctive license plates,
144 there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
145 minimum of 250 license plates.
146 b. For Quantity Class 2 distinctive license plates,
147 there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
148 minimum of 1,000 license plates.
149 (3) The use of distinctive license plate categories
150 shall be limited to use on passenger cars, pick-up trucks, and
151 self-propelled campers or house cars.
152 (c)(1) The Department of Corrections is directed to
153 shall supply all license plates and revalidation devices
154 required under this subdivision. The amounts charged by the
155 Department of Corrections for the manufacture of revalidation
156 devices shall not be less than that charged for the
157 manufacture of license plates on a per item basis.
158 (2) The Department of Corrections shall maintain an
159 accurate system of recordkeeping which shall trace and account
160 for the handling and distribution of each plate and
161 revalidation device throughout the manufacturing process until
162 the items are distributed to each county.
163 (d) After the five-year license plate has been in use
164 for a period of three years, the Department of Corrections may
165 manufacture all subsequent license plates for the remaining
166 two years of the period from a metal of less durability and
167 quality than the metal used in manufacturing the five-year
168 license plates.
Page 6

license plates.
HB651 INTRODUCED
169 (e)(1) The department shall provide the owner or owners
170 of a motor vehicle who register a license plate provided in
171 this subsection with the ability to opt-in opt in to authorize
172 the release of certain personal information or to opt-out opt
173 out to restrict the release of certain personal information by
174 the department to the sponsoring organization, college, or
175 university. The license plates that shall be subject to the
176 opt-in and opt-out provisions are as follows:
177 a. A distinctive license plate issued pursuant to this
178 section.
179 b. A collegiate or university distinctive license plate
180 issued pursuant to Section 32-6-150.
181 c. Other distinctive license plates as authorized by
182 the legislative oversight committee.
183 (2) Each owner of the motor vehicle may designate his
184 or her consent through the opt-in authorization to release
185 certain personal information included within a motor vehicle
186 registration record to the sponsoring organization, college,
187 or university. The opt-in authorization shall be made at the
188 time of initial registration through the licensing official
189 for a license plate as specified in subdivision (1).
190 Subsequent opt-in authorizations shall be made directly to the
191 department. As used in this subsection, the term "personal
192 information" includes only the following information:
193 a. Owner name.
194 b. Owner address.
195 c. Owner email address, if applicable.
196 (3) Each owner of the motor vehicle may restrict the
Page 7

(3) Each owner of the motor vehicle may restrict the
HB651 INTRODUCED
197 release of personal information included within a motor
198 vehicle registration record for a license plate as specified
199 in subdivision (1) to the sponsoring organization, college, or
200 university by selecting to opt-outopt out. The opt-out
201 selection shall be made directly to the department.
202 (4) The subsequent opt-in authorization provided in
203 subdivision (2) and opt-out selection provided in subdivision
204 (3) shall be made in a manner as prescribed by the department.
205 (5) The sponsoring organization of the distinctive
206 license plate or each college or university for which a
207 distinctive license plate has been issued may make an annual
208 request to the department for the listing of the owner
209 authorized opt-in disclosures. The sponsoring organization in
210 receipt of the listing shall be prohibited from the resale or
211 disclosure of the information to third parties without written
212 consent from the owner to whom the information pertains.
213 (f) All proposed distinctive license plates and the
214 continued issuance of all existing distinctive license plates
215 shall be subject to the approval and oversight of the
216 legislative oversight committee under Section 32-6-67 and this
217 section, except for the following:
218 (1) In-state collegiate or in-state university category
219 license plates.
220 (2) Military or veteran related category license
221 plates.
222 (3) Alabama Gold Star Family license plates as provided
223 in Section 32-6-630.
224 (g) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no
Page 8

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no
HB651 INTRODUCED
225 distinctive license plate shall be issued after five
226 consecutive years in which the plate has not met the
227 requirements for reissuance provided in this section. This
228 subsection does not apply to military or veteran related
229 categories or Alabama Gold Star Family distinctive license
230 plates.
231 (h)(1)a. The Commissioner of Revenue may require
232 personsindividuals who qualify for military and veteran
233 related categories or Alabama Gold Star Family distinctive
234 license plates to be recertified not more than every five
235 years.
236 b. The Commissioner of Revenue shall not require
237 individuals who qualify for distinctive license plates
238 described in paragraph a. to be recertified if the
239 individual's qualifying status is one that is permanent.
240 (2) by providing To be certified or recertified for a
241 distinctive license plate described in subdivision (1), an
242 individual shall provide the licensing official with Form
243 DD214 or any other documentation prescribed by law or rule as
244 evidence of qualification for the license plate. In the event
245 that Form DD214 or other qualifying documentation prescribed
246 by law or rule is unavailable, the applicant shall provide the
247 licensing official with a certification of eligibility from
248 the Department of Veterans Affairs after the applicant
249 provides that office with other authoritative documentation
250 evidencing eligibility for the license plate.
251 (h)(i) Any distinctive license plate not created
252 pursuant to this section shall be subject to the reissuance
Page 9

pursuant to this section shall be subject to the reissuance
HB651 INTRODUCED
253 provisions of this section and Section 32-6-62 unless
254 specifically exempted by law, provided the Alabama Gold Star
255 Family distinctive license plate design in effect on January
256 1, 2021, shall not be subject to the redesign provisions of
257 Section 32-6-62.
258 (i)(j) The provisions in Act 2021-407 amending this
259 section shall not amend the distribution of the additional fee
260 associated with a distinctive license plate as provided in
261 Section 32-6-68 or as otherwise provided under Article 2 of
262 this chapter."
263 Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
264 1, 2027.
Page 10